Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 6. Migrant Labor Camps.

§ 32.1-203.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Camp operator”
means a person who has charge, care or control of a migrant labor camp.

“Migrant labor camp”
or

“camp”

means one or more structures, buildings, tents, barracks, trailers, vehicles, converted buildings, and unconventional enclosures of living space, reasonably contiguous, together with the land appertaining thereto, established, operated or used as living quarters for one or more persons, one or more of whom is a migrant worker engaged in agricultural or fishing activities, including related food processing. “Migrant labor camp” does not include (i) a summer camp, campground or hotel as defined in §

35.1-1

, (ii) housing which, in the ordinary course of business, is regularly offered to the general public on a commercial basis and is provided to any migrant worker on the same or comparable terms and conditions as provided to the general public, or (iii) small businesses which are exempt under federal law as provided in the Fair Labor Standards Act and the Migrant and Seasonal Worker Protection Act.

“Migrant worker”
means any individual from within or outside the Commonwealth who passes seasonally from one place to another for the purpose of employment, who is not a year-round employee and who occupies living quarters other than his permanent home during the period of such work.

“Applicable regulations”
includes regulations of the Board adopted pursuant to this article and occupational safety and health regulations applicable to migrant labor camps adopted by the Safety and Health Codes Board pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

40.1-22

et seq.) of Title 40.1.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-415; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711; 1988, c. 632; 1990, c. 780; 1992, c. 15.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Migrant worker access to legal aid representatives. —

Representatives of a legal aid organization may access and provide information about legal resources and services to migrant workers living in a migrant labor camp owned or controlled by the workers’ employer, whether or not formally appointed or retained as counsel by any particular individual or group. Legal aid representatives who enter migrant labor camp property for such purposes do so under a bona fide claim of right, and one who enters another’s property under a bona fide claim of right has not committed a willful trespass under §

18.2-119

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David L. Doughty, Jr., Sheriff, Northampton County, 18-044, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 5 (2/22/19).

§ 32.1-204.
Notice of intention to construct, etc., camp.

Each person planning to construct, substantially remodel or enlarge for occupancy or use a migrant labor camp or any portion or facility thereof, or to convert a property for use or occupancy as a camp shall give notice in writing of his intent to do so to the Commissioner at least thirty days before the date of beginning such construction, remodeling, enlargement or conversion. The notice shall give the name of the city or county in which the property is located, the location of the property within that area, a brief description of the proposed construction, remodeling, enlargement or conversion, the name and mailing address of the person giving the notice and his telephone number, if any. Upon receipt of such notice, the Commissioner shall forward to such person a copy of this article and any applicable regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-205.
Permit required.

No person shall operate or cause to be operated a migrant labor camp without a permit nor shall any person allow a migrant labor camp without a permit to be occupied and used on property owned or controlled by such person. A separate permit shall be required for each camp and shall be posted at a place in the camp readily visible and accessible to the migrant workers.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-206.
Application for permit.

Application for a permit to operate a migrant labor camp shall be made to the Commissioner at least thirty days before such camp is to be opened on a form prescribed by the Board. A separate application shall be submitted for each camp.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-207.
Inspection; issuance of permit; permits nontransferable.

If, after inspection by the Commissioner or his designee, the Commissioner finds that the camp or the proposed operation of the camp for which an application is submitted pursuant to §

32.1-206

conforms or will conform to the provisions of this article and any applicable regulations, the Commissioner shall issue a permit for the operation of the camp. A permit shall not be transferable and shall expire on December 31 of each year.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-208.
Provisional permits.

When the Commissioner determines that a camp for which a permit is sought does not, or the proposed operation thereof will not, comply with the provisions of this article and any applicable regulations and that the operation of the camp will not create an imminent danger to the public health and safety, the Commissioner may grant a provisional permit to operate such a camp upon such terms, requirements, or conditions as the Commissioner may prescribe until the requirements of this article and any applicable regulations are fully complied with. The term of any such provisional permit shall not exceed thirty days. No provisional permit shall be renewable.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-209.
Denial, revocation or suspension of permits.

The Commissioner may deny, revoke or suspend a permit for a camp when the Commissioner determines that the camp or the proposed operation thereof does not conform to or is in violation of any provision of this article or any applicable regulations.

A new permit shall be issued upon application therefor when the camp is in compliance with the provisions of this article and any applicable regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-210.
Camp operator’s responsibilities.

The camp operator shall be responsible for ensuring that the camp complies with the provisions of this article, any applicable regulations and all conditions stated in the permit issued for the camp.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-416; 1962, c. 251; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-211.
Regulations.

The occupational, safety and health regulations of the Safety and Health Codes Board applicable to migrant labor camps shall be no more stringent than those actually enforced by the United States Department of Labor pursuant to federal law.

The Board may adopt regulations governing migrant labor camps which supplement the occupational safety and health regulations adopted by the Safety and Health Codes Board pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

40.1-22

et seq.) of Title 40.1 and which are necessary to protect the health of migrant workers. Such regulations may include, but need not be limited to, standards governing:

The sites of camps.

The provision of an adequate and convenient supply of pure water as defined in §

32.1-167

.

The disposal of sewage as defined in §

32.1-163

.

The storage and disposal of solid waste.

The maintenance of the campgrounds.

The construction, maintenance, alteration or remodeling of buildings and structures for the housing of migrant workers and their families, including wash and bathrooms, central cooking facilities, central dining rooms, sleeping quarters, assembly rooms, lighting and ventilation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-417, 32-418, 32-420; 1962, c. 251; 1968, c. 396; 1979, c. 711.